California statutes. Public Resources Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.16.

(a) A PRO shall retain an independent public accountant, certified in the United States, to annually audit the accounting books of the PRO. The department shall review the independent certified public accountant audit for compliance with this chapter and consistency with the PRO’s plan and annual report, submitted pursuant to this chapter. After the department conducts its own audit, the department shall notify the PRO of any conduct or practice that does not comply with this chapter or of any inconsistencies identified in the audit. The PRO may obtain copies of the department’s audit, including proprietary information contained in the department’s audit, upon request, and withhold from disclosure confidential proprietary information to the extent allowed under Section 1040 of the Evidence Code and
 Section 7929.000 of the Government Code. The items submitted to the department as part of the independent audit shall include:

(1) Financial statements audited in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP).

(2) An audit of the PRO’s compliance with this chapter.

(3) An audit of the PRO’s adherence to, execution of, and consistency with its plan.

(b) The PRO shall include the independent audit in its annual report submitted to the department pursuant to Section 42984.17 commencing within 18 months of plan approval by the department. The department shall review the audit for compliance with this chapter and consistency with the PRO’s plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.17.

A PRO shall annually submit to the department, in the form and manner and by the date determined by the department, an annual report and make that report publicly available on the PRO’s internet website. The report shall include at minimum, all of the following information for the preceding calendar year unless otherwise specified:

(a) The PRO’s costs, according to the cost categories established in the plan, and revenues.

(b) A summary of any anticipated changes to allocations in cost categories for the next calendar year.

(c) Any changes to the distribution of a participating producer’s costs.

(d) The amounts of the eco-modulated fees based on the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42984.14 and the PRO’s evaluation of the effectiveness of the eco-modulated fees.

(e) An updated list of producers participating in the plan and an updated list of the names and contact information, including email address, telephone number, and physical and mailing addresses of producers and brands of covered products covered under the plan.

(f) A list of the PRO’s collection sites, by name, location, and type.

(g) (1) The amount of covered products sold in or into the state by the producers covered by the PRO’s plan.

(2) The amount described in paragraph
 (1) shall be broken down by fiber type category and Harmonized Tariff Schedule of the United States (HTS) number.

(h) The total weight of covered products, respectively, that were collected, broken down by fiber type categories.

(i) The total weight of covered products, by category, that were collected and deemed reusable by each respective authorized collector and authorized sorter.

(j) A list of each authorized sorter, authorized repair business, and covered product recycling facility used by the PRO, including both of the following:

(1) Name and location.

(2) Total weight of covered products handled by each location.

(k) The total weight and number of covered products sold in or into the state attributed to a producer, who is a registered participant of the PRO’s plan, which are collected in the state and reused or recycled by the PRO, including a description of the methodology and information used to determine and calculate these values.

(l) A complete accounting of the ultimate disposition of all covered products collected by the PRO, including the total weight of covered products that were repaired and recycled.

(m) Metrics and a description of the progress toward attaining the performance standards included in the plan.

(n) A description of methods used to collect, transport, repair, and recycle covered products by the PRO, including a description of all of the following:

(1) How the PRO handled and managed covered products according to the waste hierarchy as defined in Section 40051.

(2) How the PRO maximized reuse and recycling of all covered products.

(3) How the PRO minimized disposal of all covered products collected by the PRO.

(4) Results of the PRO’s assessment of the efficacy of the collection, sorting, and transportation process.

(o) A description of how the PRO provided incentive payments, grants, and market development investments to support the infrastructure necessary to effectively implement the plan, including how incentive payments, grants, and market development investments prioritized infrastructure closer to the point of generation.

(p) A description of outreach efforts and education, including, but not limited to, the PRO’s evaluation of the efficacy of the comprehensive statewide education and outreach program pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 42984.10.

(q) A description of how the PRO coordinated with other PROs and entities pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 42984.10.

(r) A report on activities the PRO has undertaken to prioritize the use of sorting and recycling facilities located closer to the point of generation to minimize transportation emissions and increase accountability for the ultimate disposition of collected covered products.

(s) An analysis of whether the PRO met performance standards established by the PRO pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42984.10 or
 by the department pursuant to Section 42984.19.

(t) A description of how the PRO addressed the presence of PFAS and other chemicals regulated under Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 25249.5) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code and Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 108945) of, and Chapter 13.5 (commencing with Section 108970) of, Part 3 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, the actions taken and investments made to avoid contamination in the recycling process, and the availability of end markets for recycled material that could not be remanufactured into textiles or textile articles in California.

(u) Any other information deemed relevant by the PRO for the department to determine compliance with the approved plan.

(v) Any other information required by
 regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42984.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.18.

(a) No later than 120 days after the date the department receives the annual report submitted by a PRO pursuant to Section 42984.17, the department shall notify the PRO if the annual report is compliant or noncompliant.

(b) If the department determines that the annual report is noncompliant due to failure to meet the requirements of this chapter, the department may require the resubmittal of the annual report or take enforcement action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Department Responsibilities [42984.19. - 42984.19.]

42984.19.

After March 1, 2032, the department may establish, review, and may adjust performance standards and the dates by which they are required to be achieved based on information included in the plan and annual reports, other information provided by the PRO, department waste characterization studies, needs assessment, and economic and any other relevant information, as determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Enforcement and Civil Penalties [42984.20. - 42984.24.]

42984.20.

(a) Within 12 months of the effective date of regulations pursuant to Section 42984.2, and on or before July 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall post on its internet website a list of producers that are in compliance with this chapter. The department shall list, as appropriate, the reported brands of covered products for each producer.

(b) A producer that is not listed on the department’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (a) that demonstrates compliance with this chapter before the next list is posted by the department may either be added to the internet website or be provided a certification letter from the department stating that the producer of a covered product is in compliance with this chapter. The department’s
 list of compliant entities shall be available on the department’s internet website in a machine-readable format.

(c) (1) A retailer, importer, distributor, or online marketplace shall monitor the department’s internet website where compliant producers are posted, as provided in subdivision (a), to determine if a producer, brand, or covered product is in compliance with this chapter for that producer of covered products.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (d), on and after the date a plan is approved by the department pursuant to Section 42984.8, a retailer, importer, distributor, or online marketplace shall not sell, distribute, offer for sale, or import a covered product in or into the state for sale in the state unless the producer of the covered product is listed as in compliance pursuant to this section for that brand and covered product.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), a retailer, importer, distributor, or online marketplace may sell, offer for sale, import, or distribute a covered product if the retailer, importer, distributor, or online marketplace has fulfilled the obligations for those covered products which the retailer, importer, distributor, or online marketplace sells, offers for sale, imports, or distributes pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (s) of Section 42984.3.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), a retailer, importer, distributor, or online marketplace may sell, offer for sale, import, or distribute a covered product if, on the date the retailer or distributor sells or offers for sale the covered product in or into the state, the producer, brand, or covered product was listed as compliant on the department’s internet website.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), a retailer or distributor may, for any existing inventory in stock before the initial list was posted by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), sell or distribute that inventory for sale in or into the state.

(e) (1) If the department determines a producer is not in compliance with this chapter, the department shall remove the producer, along with its brands and covered products, from the list of compliant producers posted on the department’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) The department shall list on its internet website a producer, along with its brands and covered products, if the department subsequently determines that the producer is in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.21.

(a) An administrative civil penalty up to the following amounts may be administratively imposed by the department on any person who is in violation of any provision of this chapter:

(1) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day.

(2) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day if the violation is intentional or knowing.

(b) In assessing or reviewing the amount of a civil penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) for a violation of this chapter, the department or the court shall consider all of the following:

(1) The nature and extent of the violation.

(2) The number and severity of the violation or violations.

(3) The economic effect of the penalty on the violator.

(4) Whether the violator took good faith measures to comply with this chapter and the period of time over which these measures were taken.

(5) The willfulness of the violator’s misconduct.

(6) The deterrent effect that the imposition of the penalty would have on both the violator and the regulated community.

(7) Any other factor that justice may require.

(c) The department shall establish, through regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42984.2, a
 process that shall include an informal hearing process by which the penalties will be assessed.

(d) The department shall deposit all penalties collected pursuant to this section into the Textile Stewardship Recovery Penalty Account, which is hereby created in the Textile Stewardship Recovery Fund. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Textile Stewardship Recovery Penalty Account shall be available for expenditure by the department on activities related to the collection and recycling of covered products, grants for related purposes, and the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(e) The Administrative Adjudication Bill of Rights, as set forth in Article 6 (commencing with Section 11425.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, applies to hearings conducted under this chapter and mandates minimum due
 process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 175.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.22.

Upon a written finding that a producer, PRO, manufacturer, distributor, retailer, or importer site has not met a material requirement of this chapter, in addition to any other penalties authorized under this chapter, the department may take one or both of the following actions to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter, after affording the entity a reasonable opportunity to respond to, or rebut, the finding, take any of the following actions to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter:

(a) Revoke the PRO’s plan approval or require the PRO to resubmit the plan.

(b) Require additional reporting relating to compliance with the material requirement of this chapter that
 was not met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.23.

(a) A producer, PRO, manufacturer, distributor, retailer, or importer shall do both of the following:

(1) Upon request, provide the department with reasonable and timely access, as determined by the department, to its facilities and operations, as necessary to determine compliance with this chapter.

(2) Upon request, within 14 days, provide the department with relevant records necessary to determine compliance with this chapter.

(b) The records required by this chapter shall be maintained and accessible for five years. All reports and records provided to the department pursuant to this chapter shall be provided
 under penalty of perjury.

(c) (1) The department may impose administrative civil penalties pursuant to Section 42984.21 on a producer, PRO, manufacturer, distributor, retailer, or importer that fails to provide the department with the access required pursuant to this section.

(2) The department may post a notice on the department’s internet website that is maintained pursuant to Section 42984.20 that a producer that fails to provide the department with access pursuant to this section, along with the producer’s brands and covered products, is no longer in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.24.

After the time for judicial review under Section 11523 of the Government Code has expired, the department may apply to the small claims court or superior court, depending on the jurisdictional amount and any other remedy sought, in the county where the penalties, restitution, or other remedy was imposed by the department, for a judgment to collect any unpaid civil penalties or restitution or to enforce any other remedy provided by this chapter. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the final agency order or decision, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment. The court clerk shall enter the judgment immediately in conformity with the application. The judgment so entered shall have the same force and effect as and shall be subject to all the provisions of law relating to
 a judgment in a civil action and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court. The court shall make enforcement of the judgment a priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Antitrust Immunity [42984.25. - 42984.25.]

42984.25.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an action specified in subdivision (b) that is taken by a PRO that relates to any of the following is not a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or the Unfair Competition Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code).

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to all of the following actions taken by a PRO:

(1) The creation, implementation, or management of a
 plan approved by the department pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42984.8) and the determination of the types or quantities of covered products repaired, reused, recycled, or otherwise managed pursuant to a plan.

(2) The determination of the cost and structure of an approved plan.

(3) The establishment, administration, collection, or disbursement of a charge associated with funding the implementation of this chapter.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to an agreement that does any of the following:

(1) Fixes a price of or for covered products, except for an agreement related to costs or charges associated with participation in a plan approved by the department and otherwise in accordance with this chapter.

(2) Fixes the output or production of covered products.

(3) Restricts the geographic area in which, or customers to whom, covered products will be sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. County Authority [42984.26. - 42984.26.]

42984.26.

This chapter does not grant a city, county, city and county, special district, or joint powers authority any new authority over solid waste hauling operations pursuant to a franchise agreement and does not affect, limit, or abrogate in any manner any franchise granted to a solid waste enterprise for the handling of solid waste.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Online Marketplace [42984.27. - 42984.27.]

42984.27.

An online marketplace shall annually do the following in accordance with regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42984.2:

(a) (1) Notify the department and the PRO of all third-party sellers with sales of covered products over one million dollars ($1,000,000) sold on their online marketplace in the preceding year and provide all required information. If a third-party seller does not have any sales in California during the preceding year then the online marketplace shall not provide their information to the department.

(2) The amount of sales described in paragraph (1) includes only those transactions through the online marketplace for which payment is
 processed by the online marketplace directly or through its payment processor.

(b) Provide all third-party sellers described in (a) with the information on requirements of law as provided by the PRO pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (g) of Section 42984.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 21. Used Mattress Recovery and Recycling Act [42985. - 42994.]

42985.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) In order to reduce illegal dumping, increase recycling, and substantially reduce public agency costs for the end-of-life management of used mattresses, the Used Mattress Recovery and Recycling Act is hereby established by this chapter to require manufacturers of mattresses sold in this state to develop, finance, and implement a convenient and cost-effective program to recover and recycle used mattresses generated in this
 state.

(2) The program developed and implemented by manufacturers of mattresses sold in this state shall strive for the maximum feasible level of recovery and recycling of used mattresses generated in support of the statewide goal that at least 75 percent of all solid waste be recycled by January 1, 2020.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter that consumers have the opportunity to drop off
 their used mattresses free of charge and that this chapter will not undermine existing used mattress recycling, resale, refurbishing, and reuse operations that are in compliance with state and federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   (SB 254)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

42985.1.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Used Mattress Recovery and Recycling Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   (SB 254)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [42986. - 42986.]

42986.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) (1) “Consumer” means an owner of a mattress, including a person, business, corporation, limited partnership, nonprofit organization, or governmental entity, and including the ultimate purchaser, owner, or lessee of a mattress.

(2) “Consumer” does not include a government organization or other party that obtains one or more used mattresses in the course of collecting used mattresses for recycling for purposes of this chapter, or through the ordinary collection and handling of municipal solid waste.

(b) “Distributor” means a company that has a contractual
 relationship with one or more manufacturers to market and sell mattresses to retailers.

(c) “Foundation” means a ticking-covered structure used to support a mattress or sleep surface. The structure may include constructed frames, foam, box springs, or other materials, used alone or in combination.

(d) “Good faith effort” means all reasonable and economically practical efforts by a mattress recycling organization to implement the components identified in its approved plan consistent with its annual budget.

(e) “Importer” means a party qualifying as an “importer of record” for purposes of Section 1484(a)(2)(B) of Title 19 of the United States Code, with regard to the import of a finished mattress sold
 in the state that was manufactured or assembled by a company outside the United States.

(f) (1) “Manufacturer” means any of the following:

(A) The person who manufactures a mattress and who sells, offers for sale, or distributes a mattress in the state.

(B) If there is no person who is a manufacturer of a mattress for purposes of subparagraph (A), the manufacturer is the person who imports the mattress into the state for sale or distribution.

(2) Except as provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42987, a retailer that brings a mattress into its store locations from an out-of-state warehouse or distribution center is not
 a manufacturer.

(g) (1) “Mattress” means a resilient material or combination of materials that is enclosed by a ticking, is used alone or in combination with other products, and is intended for or promoted for sleeping upon.

(2) “Mattress” includes a foundation, a renovated mattress or renovated foundation, and a futon mattress.

(3) “Mattress” does not include the following:

(A) An unattached mattress pad or unattached mattress topper, including items with resilient filling, with or without ticking, intended to be used with or on top of a mattress.

(B) A sleeping bag or
 pillow.

(C) A car bed, crib, or bassinet mattress.

(D) Juvenile products, including a carriage, basket, dressing table, stroller, playpen, infant carrier, lounge pad, or crib bumper, and the pads for those juvenile products.

(E) A product containing liquid- and gaseous-filled ticking, including a water bed and air mattress that does not contain upholstery material between the ticking and the mattress core.

(F) Upholstered furniture that does not otherwise contain a detachable mattress or that is a fold out sofa bed, sleeper sofa, or folding cot.

(h) “Mattress recycling organization” or “organization” means an
 organization exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, that is established by a qualified industry association, composed of manufacturers, renovators, and retailers, and certified pursuant to Section 42987, to develop, implement, and administer the mattress recycling program established pursuant to this chapter.

(i) “Used mattress recovery and recycling plan” or “plan” means the plan for recycling used mattresses that is developed by the mattress recycling organization pursuant to this chapter.

(j) “Program” or “used mattress recycling program” means the program implemented by the mattress recycling organization
 pursuant to a plan approved by the department.

(k) “Qualified industry association” means the International Sleep Products Association or a successor of that organization, or a group of mattress manufacturers that collectively represent at least 35 percent of the volume of mattresses manufactured in the United States.

(l) “Recycle” or “recycling” has the same meaning as defined in Section 40180.

(m) “Recycler” means a person that engages in the manual or mechanical separation of mattresses to substantially recover components and commodities contained in mattresses for the purpose of reuse or recycling.

(n) “Recycling charge” or
 “charge” means the charge imposed on the sale of a new or renovated mattress at the point of sale and collected by the organization to fund the recycling of used mattresses pursuant to this chapter.

(o) (1) “Renovate” or “renovation” means altering a used mattress for the purpose of resale and includes one or more of the following:

(A) Replacing the mattress, ticking, or filling.

(B) Adding additional filling.

(C) Rebuilding a used mattress.

(D) Replacing components with new or postconsumer materials unless the material is a clean recycled material, consists of used electronic
 parts or controls, or is a used mattress base that is not covered by ticking.

(2) “Renovate” or “renovation” does not include any of the
 following:

(A) Stripping a mattress of its ticking or filling without adding new material.

(B) Sterilizing or sanitizing a mattress without otherwise altering the mattress.

(C) Altering a mattress by a renovator when a person retains the altered mattress for lease, rental, or personal use.

(D) Refurbishing that disqualifies a mattress for a yellow wholesale renovator tag to be affixed to the mattress, in accordance with the regulations adopted by the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(p) “Renovator” means a person who renovates used mattresses for the purpose of sale, or offering
 for sale, in this state.

(q) “Retailer” means a person who sells mattresses in the state or offers to a consumer a mattress in the state through any means, including, but not limited to, by remote offering, including sales outlets or catalogs, electronically through the internet, by telephone, or through the mail.

(r) “Sale” or “sell” means the transfer of title of a mattress for consideration, including by a manufacturer, a distributor, or a retailer for eventual consumption to a consumer in the state, including remote sales conducted through sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet or any other similar electronic means. For purposes of this chapter, a long-term lease of not less than 12 months is the same as a sale.

(s) “Solid waste facility” means, for purposes of this chapter, a solid waste facility as defined in Section 40194 that accepts, under its normal operating conditions, used mattresses for collection, storing, and handling, whether for recycling or disposal.

(t) (1) “Ticking” means the outermost layer of fabric or related material of a mattress.

(2) “Ticking” does not include another layer of fabric or related material that is quilted together with, or otherwise attached to, the outermost layer of fabric or related material.

(u) “Used mattress” means a mattress that has been abandoned or discarded by a consumer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 673, Sec. 1.   (AB 187)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Mattress Recycling Plan [42987. - 42987.5.]

42987.

(a) (1) A qualified industry association or a successor organization may establish a mattress recycling organization for purposes of this chapter, which shall be composed of manufacturers, renovators, and retailers and be certified pursuant to this section to develop, implement, and administer the mattress recycling program established pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Within 60 days of receipt of a request for certification, the department shall notify the requesting qualified industry association of the department’s decision whether or not to certify that a mattress recycling organization has been established by the qualified industry association or successor
 organization and is composed of manufacturers, renovators, and retailers for purposes of establishing the mattress recycling plan.

(3) (A) Prior to certification by the department, the department’s director shall appoint an advisory committee to be part of the mattress recycling organization.

(B) The advisory committee may be composed of members of the environmental community, solid waste industry, and local government public and private representatives involved in the collection, processing, and recycling of used mattresses, and other interested parties.

(C) (i) The mattress recycling organization shall consult the advisory committee at least once during the development and 
 implementation of the plan required pursuant to Section 42987.1, and annually prior to the submission of both an annual report required pursuant to Section 42990.1 and an annual budget required pursuant to Section 42988.

(ii) For purposes of being consulted pursuant to this subparagraph, the advisory committee shall prepare specific written recommendations at a publicly scheduled and noticed meeting of the advisory committee that are approved by a majority of the advisory committee’s members pursuant to a rollcall vote and included in the official approved minutes of the meeting. The
 organization shall consider and respond to those written recommendations in writing.

(b) (1) Each manufacturer, renovator, distributor, and retailer shall register with the mattress recycling organization.

(2) A retailer may register with the mattress recycling organization as a manufacturer for a brand for which there is not a registered manufacturer.

(c) A retailer shall not sell, distribute, or offer for sale a mattress in the state unless the retailer is in compliance with this chapter and the manufacturer or renovator of the mattress sold by the retailer is listed in compliance with this chapter.

(d) A manufacturer, renovator,
 or distributor shall not sell, offer for sale, or import a mattress in this state, or sell or distribute a mattress to a distributor or retailer, unless the manufacturer, renovator, or distributor is in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 673, Sec. 2.   (AB 187)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42987.1.

On or before July 1, 2015, the mattress recycling organization shall develop and submit to the department a plan for recycling used mattresses in the state in an economically efficient and practical manner that includes all of the following goals and elements:

(a) Program objectives consistent with the state’s solid waste management hierarchy.

(b) The names of manufacturers, renovators, distributors, and brands covered under the plan.

(c) A consultation process with affected stakeholders, including, but not limited to, local government representatives, recyclers, and solid
 waste industry representatives.

(d) Methods to increase the number of used mattresses diverted from landfills, reduce the number of illegally dumped used mattresses, and increase the quantity of used materials recovered through this process and recycled for other uses.

(e) (1) The establishment and administration of a means for funding the plan in a manner that distributes the mattress recycling organization’s costs uniformly over all mattresses sold in the state.

(2) The funding mechanism shall provide sufficient funding for
 the mattress recycling organization to carry out the plan, including the administrative, operational, and capital costs of the plan.

(f) The publishing of an annual report for each calendar year of operation.

(g) Conducting research, as needed, related to improving used mattress collection, dismantling, and recycling operations, including pilot programs to test new processes, methods, or equipment on a local, regional, or otherwise limited basis.

(h) A program performance measurement that shall collect program data for the purpose of the annual report. The information shall include both of the following:

(1) A methodology for estimating the amount of
 mattresses sold in the state and used mattresses available for collection in the state, and for quantifying the number of used mattresses collected and recycled in the state.

(2) A methodology for determining mattresses sold in the state by the manufacturers and renovators of the mattress recycling organization.

(i) A description of methods used to coordinate activities with existing used mattress collecting and recycling programs, including existing nonprofit mattress recyclers, and with other relevant parties as appropriate, with regard to the proper management or recycling of discarded or abandoned mattresses, for purposes of providing the efficient delivery of services and avoiding unnecessary duplication of effort and expense.

(j) Entering into contracts or agreements, which may include contracts and agreements with existing nonprofit or for-profit recyclers, that are necessary and proper for the mattress recycling organization to carry out these duties consistent with the terms of this chapter.

(k) Establishing a financial incentive to encourage parties to collect for recycling used mattresses discarded or illegally dumped in the state.

(l) Ensuring, to the maximum extent possible, that urban and rural local governments and participating permitted solid waste facilities and authorized solid waste operations that accept mattresses are provided with a mechanism for the recovery of illegally disposed used mattresses that is funded at no additional cost to the local government,
 solid waste facility, or solid waste operation.

(m) Developing strategies, in consultation with the California Environmental Protection Agency’s Environmental Justice Task Force and other relevant parties, for collecting used mattresses for recycling in areas and communities that face unique challenges associated with proper waste management such as poverty, language barriers, and illegal mattress dumping.

(n) Providing outreach efforts and education to consumers, manufacturers, and retailers, for the purpose of promoting the recycling of used mattresses and options available to consumers for the free dropoff or collection of used mattresses.

(o) A provision that allows an individual to drop off, at no charge, a mattress
 at a recycler, renovator, mattress recycling center, permitted solid waste facility, authorized solid waste operation, or other municipal facility that accepts mattresses consistent with state solid waste regulations, and that provides for the payment to a municipal or solid waste facility or operation that accepts mattresses an amount determined by the municipal or solid waste facility or operation and the mattress recycling organization to be reasonable for accepting, collecting, storing, transporting, and handling used mattresses.

(p) Ensuring that the impact of Article XIII C of the California Constitution is addressed for local governments participating in the program.

(q) A report from the advisory committee, established pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of
 Section 42987, that includes a summary of the consultative process between the advisory committee and the mattress recycling organization during the development of, and any updates to, the plan, as well as any other information deemed pertinent by the advisory committee to
 maximizing the recovery and recycling of used mattresses in the state.

(r) A contingency plan in the event the department decertifies the mattress recycling organization, or a mattress recycling plan expires, is disapproved, or is revoked. The contingency plan shall describe how the plan objectives can be carried out, in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 42989.3, in the absence of a plan, either by the mattress recycling organization, or by the department through some entity such as an escrow company.

(s) Other information requested by the department that is reasonably related to compliance with the recycling plan and that the organization can reasonably compile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 673, Sec. 3.   (AB 187)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42987.1.5.

(a) During calendar year 2020, and at least once every five years thereafter, the mattress recycling organization shall review the plan and determine whether amendments to the plan are necessary.

(b) If the organization determines amendments to the plan are necessary, it shall amend the plan, subject to the approval process in Section 42987.3.

(c) If the organization determines that no amendments to the plan are necessary, it shall send a letter to the department explaining that the organization has reviewed the plan and determined no revisions are needed. The department may disapprove the
 organization’s determination within 30 days of that determination if it concludes that the organization cannot implement the objectives of this chapter without amending the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 673, Sec. 4.   (AB 187)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42987.2.

In preparing the plan pursuant to Section 42987.1 and any updates to the plan pursuant to Section 42987.1.5, the mattress recycling organization shall consult with interested stakeholders, which shall include, but not be limited to, local government representatives, recyclers, and solid waste industry representatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 673, Sec. 5.   (AB 187)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42987.3.
